Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1985
Committees of the board.

(a) Unless prohibited or limited by the articles or bylaws, a board of directors may create one or more committees of the board and appoint members of the board to serve on them. Each committee shall have two or more directors who serve at the pleasure of the board.

(b) The creation of a committee and appointment of members to it must be approved by the greater of:

(1) A majority of all the directors in office when the action is taken; or

(2) The number of directors required by the articles or bylaws to take action under section 21-1984.

(c) Sections 21-1980 to 21-1984, which govern meetings, action without meetings, notice and waiver of notice, and quorum and voting requirements of the board, shall apply to committees of the board and their members. Unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise, members of a committee may participate in a meeting of the committee or conduct the meeting through the use of any means of communication by which all members participating may simultaneously hear each other during the meeting. A member participating in a meeting by this means is deemed to be present at the meeting.

(d) To the extent specified by the board of directors or in the articles or bylaws, each committee of the board may exercise the board's authority under section 21-1968.

(e) A committee of the board may not:

(1) Authorize distributions;

(2) Approve or recommend to members the dissolution, the merger, or the sale, pledge, or transfer of all or substantially all of the corporation's assets;

(3) Elect, appoint, or remove directors or fill vacancies on the board or on any of its committees; or

(4) Adopt, amend, or repeal the articles or bylaws.

(f) The creation of, delegation of authority to, or action by a committee does not alone constitute compliance by a director with the standards of conduct described in section 21-1986.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 85.